Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The vessel bridge collision work group is created, composed of the following members:(a) A representative of the Washington state department of transportation, who shall chair the work group;(b) A representative of the Oregon department of transportation;(c) A representative of Columbia river pilots;(d) A representative of Puget Sound pilots;(e) A representative of the Washington state board of pilotage commissioners;(f) A representative of the United States coast guard;(g) A representative of the United States army corps of engineers;(h) A representative of the Washington state emergency management division specializing in emergency planning; and(i) A representative of local government specializing in emergency planning.(2) The work group shall review the impact resistance of Washington state bridges that might be vulnerable to large commercial vessel collisions, and provide recommendations regarding how to both reduce collisions and lessen the impacts of collisions. The recommendations must include near, medium, and long-term recommendations, and the estimated costs of each recommendation.(3) The work group must submit a report with relevant recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2026.(4) Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.(5) The Washington state department of transportation and the Washington emergency management division shall jointly provide staff support for coordinating and administering the work group and technical assistance as requested by work group members.(6) At the direction of the work group, and as resources allow, consultants may be hired to assist with the efforts of the work group.(7) For purposes of this section, "large commercial vessels" means vessels that (a) carry cargo or passengers for a fee and (b) are more than 1,300 gross tons (international) or exceed 200 feet in overall length.(8) This section expires December 31, 2026.--- END ---